Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 12

Aid to Disabled Persons — Personal Care Service Subsidies

71-4-1201. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Division” means the division of vocational rehabilitation of the department of human services;

“Employed” means engaged in activity of thirty (30) or more hours per week for which the individual receives remuneration at a rate not less than the federal minimum wage;

“Family member” means an individual's parent, grandparent, sibling, child, spouse, spouse's parent, spouse's grandparent, spouse's sibling or spouse's child;

“Personal care assistance services” means services rendered at least five (5) days a week at the times of day that are required by an individual with a severe physical disability to become physically independent in connection with actual employment. These services include, but are not limited to, any or all of following:

Routine bodily functions, such as bowel or bladder care;

Dressing;

Preparation and consumption of food;

Moving into, out of, or turning in bed;

Routine bathing;

Ambulation; or

Any other similar activity of daily living as determined appropriate by the division; and

“Severe physical disability” means a functional loss of both arms and both legs, when it is anticipated that the loss will be permanent.

Acts 1986, ch. 905, § 3; T.C.A., §14-16-201.

71-4-1202. Authorized.

The division shall subsidize personal care assistance services pursuant to this part for an individual eligible under §71-4-1205. Such subsidy for any individual shall not exceed forty (40) hours per week.

Acts 1986, ch. 905, § 4; T.C.A., §14-16-202.

71-4-1203. Eligibility.

An individual is eligible for a personal care assistance services subsidy under this part if such individual:

Is eighteen (18) years of age or older;

Has a severe physical disability;

Is receiving or has received vocational rehabilitation services from the division;

Is employed or ready for employment;

Has a need documented under § 71-4-1205 for not less than fourteen (14) hours a week of personal care assistance service provided by a person other than a family member, which services are necessary to enable the individual to be employed;

Is not otherwise eligible for personal care assistance services under other state or federal programs;

Agrees to a periodic reevaluation of such individual's need for personal care assistance services and of the extent of that need;

Has no or insufficient personal income or other support from public services, family members or neighbors;

Agrees to recruit, hire, fire, and supervise the person who provides personal care assistance services to such individual; and

Qualifies under § 71-4-1206.

Acts 1986, ch. 905, § 5; T.C.A., §14-16-203.

71-4-1204. Amount.

The division shall determine the amount of subsidy provided under § 71-4-1202 by the following formula:

Individual's annual gross income, including social security disability income (SSDI), supplemental security income (SSI) and disability pensions;

Subtract federal and state income taxes paid from the amount in subdivision (a)(1);

Subtract standard federal personal and state income tax exemptions from the remainder in subdivision (a)(2);

Subtract F.I.C.A. or mandatory pension contributions from the remainder in subdivision (a)(3);

Subtract impairment related work expenses that are incurred by the individual in order to function on a job and that are not reimbursed by a third party from the remainder in subdivision (a)(4);

Divide the remainder in subdivision (a)(5) by two (2); and

Subtract four thousand eight hundred dollars ($4,800) from the quotient in subdivision (a)(6).

If there is no income remaining after application of the formula in subsection (a), the division shall subsidize full cost for personal care assistance services provided to that individual.

If there is income remaining after application of formula in subsection (a), the cost to the division for personal care services provided to that individual shall be reduced by the amount of that income.

This program may supplement any other program for which the individual is eligible.

Acts 1986, ch. 905, § 6; T.C.A., §14-16-204.

Compiler's Notes. Provisions regarding the F.I.C.A. (Federal Insurance Contributions Act) referred to in this section, are compiled in 26 U.S.C. §§ 3101-3126.

Provisions regarding social security disability income, referred to in this section, are codified in 42 U.S.C. § 423.

Provisions regarding social security income, referred to in this section, are compiled in 42 U.S.C. § 1381 et seq.

71-4-1205. Eligibility evaluation teams.

The director of the division shall designate one (1) or more evaluation teams, which shall consist of at least two (2) persons, one (1) of whom shall be a licensed medical professional and one (1) of whom shall be a licensed occupational therapist or physical therapist.

Each individual who applies to the division for a personal care assistance services subsidy shall be evaluated by an evaluation team, which shall determine the need of that individual for personal care assistance service and the extent of that need.

An individual receiving a personal care assistance services subsidy pursuant to this part shall be periodically reevaluated by an evaluation team to determine such individual's continuing need for personal care assistance services and the extent of that need.

Acts 1986, ch. 905, § 7; T.C.A., §14-16-205.

71-4-1206. Rules and regulations — Establishment of hourly rate.

The commissioner of human services shall promulgate, in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, such rules as shall be necessary to ensure that this part is implemented in an efficient and effective manner.

The commissioner is authorized to establish the hourly rate for the subsidy for personal care assistance services. Funding for the subsidy provided by this part shall be from year to year as such funds are specifically appropriated in the general appropriations act pursuant to title 9, chapter 4, part 51.

Acts 1986, ch. 905, § 8; T.C.A., §14-16-206.

71-4-1207. Funds.

In addition to any state funds appropriated to provide services under this part, the department of human services may apply for and use any federal or private funds, grants, and other support that is available to carry out the personal care assistance program.

Expenditures under this part shall be subject to the approval of the commissioner of finance and administration.

Acts 1986, ch. 905, §§ 11, 13; T.C.A., §14-16-207.

71-4-1208. Annual reports — Register of individuals.

The department of human services shall annually report to the governor and the general assembly on the progress made in the personal care assistance program and shall maintain a register of individuals served and individuals eligible for the program but unserved.

Acts 1986, ch. 905, § 9; T.C.A., §14-16-208.

71-4-1209. [Reserved.]

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, to the extent permitted by federal law, the value of federal veterans education benefits received by an applicant shall not be included as any form of income when making eligibility determinations for assistance under this part.

Acts 2003, ch. 239, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Provisions concerning federal veteran's educational benefits are codified in 38 U.S.C. § 3101.

Parts 13-20

[Reserved]